Missouri, session 2026, HB1844.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 334, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto fourteen new sections,
to be known as sections 334.1900, 334.1903, 334.1906, 334.1909, 334.1912, 334.1915,
334.1918, 334.1921, 334.1924, 334.1927, 334.1930, 334.1933, 334.1936, and 334.1939, to
read as follows:
334.1900. 1. Sections 334.1900 to 334.1939 shall be known and cited as the
Athletic Trainer Compact. The purposes of this compact are to expand mobility of
Athletic Training practice and improve public access to services by providing qualified
Licensed Athletic Trainers the ability to practice in other Member States. This compact
preserves the regulatory authority of States to protect public health and safety through
the current system of State licensure.
2. This compact is designed to achieve the following objectives:
(1) Increase public access to Athletic Training and enhance continuity of care by
providing for the mutual recognition of other Licenses issued by Member States;
(2) Provide an additional streamlined opportunity for interstate practice by
Licensed Athletic Trainers who meet compact uniform requirements;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1844 2
(3) Promote mobility and workforce development by eliminating the necessity
for Licenses in multiple States by providing for the mutual recognition of other Licenses
issued by Member States;
(4) Reduce administrative burdens on Licensed Athletic Trainers and Member
States;
(5) Enhance the States' ability to protect the public's health and safety;
(6) Encourage the cooperation of Member States in regulating interstate practice
of Licensed Athletic Trainers;
(7) Support relocating Active Military Members and their spouses;
(8) Enhance the exchange of licensure, investigative, and disciplinary
information among Member States;
(9) Allow for the use of telehealth to facilitate increased access to Athletic
Training services;
(10) Support the uniformity of Licensed Athletic Trainer licensure requirements
throughout the States;
(11) Affirm the authority of all Member States to hold a Licensed Athletic
Trainer accountable for abiding by the Scope of Practice in the State in which the
patient is located at the time of care; and
(12) Require adherence to the Model Compact Language in order to promote
uniformity and ensure that all Member States have accepted and are mutually obligated
to the same terms.
334.1903. As used in this compact, unless the context requires otherwise, the
following definitions shall apply:
(1) "Active Military Member" means any individual with full-time duty status in
the active armed forces of the United States, including members of the National Guard
and Reserve.
(2) "Adverse Action" means any administrative, civil, equitable or criminal
action permitted by a State's laws which is imposed by a Licensing Authority or other
authority against a Licensee, including actions against an individual's License or
Compact Privilege such as revocation, suspension, probation, monitoring of the
Licensee, limitation on the Licensee's practice, or any other Encumbrance on licensure
affecting a Licensee's authorization to practice.
(3) "Alternative Program" means a non-disciplinary monitoring or practice
remediation process applicable to an Athletic Trainer approved by a State Licensing
Authority of a Member State in which the Athletic Trainer is licensed. This includes,
but is not limited to, programs to which Licensees with substance use, addiction, or
mental health conditions are referred in lieu of Adverse Action.

HB 1844 3
(4) "Athletic Training" means the prevention, examination, assessment,
treatment and rehabilitation of emergent, acute, or chronic injuries and medical
conditions as defined by applicable Member State laws and regulations.
(5) "Athletic Trainer Compact Commission" or "Compact Commission" means
the government agency whose membership consists of all States that have enacted this
compact, as described herein and which shall operate as an instrumentality of the
Member States to administer and implement the compact according to its terms.
(6) "BOC" means the Board of Certification, Inc. or any successor organization
thereto.
(7) "CAATE" means the Commission on Accreditation of Athletic Training
Education or any successor organization thereto.
(8) "Charter Member State" means any Member State which enacted and made
effective this compact by law before the compact effective date specified herein.
(9) "Commissioner" means the individual appointed by a Member State to serve
as the member of the Commission for that Member State.
(10) "Compact Privilege" means the legal authorization granted by a Remote
State, equivalent to a License, allowing a Licensee from another Member State to
provide Athletic Training services in a Remote State.
(11) "Compact Qualifying License" means a License that is not an Encumbered
License issued by a Member State to practice Athletic Training which qualifies the
Licensee to exercise a Compact Privilege pursuant to section 334.1909.
(12) "Continuing Competence" means a requirement, as a condition of License
renewal, to provide evidence of successful participation, and completion of, educational
and professional activities relevant to practice or area of work. For purposes of this
compact, evidence of active BOC certification may satisfy the meaning of Continuing
Competence as set forth herein.
(13) "Current Significant Investigative Information" means the existence of:
(a) Investigative Information that a Licensing Authority, after a preliminary
inquiry that includes notification and an opportunity for the subject Licensee to
respond, if required by State law, has reason to believe is not groundless and, if proven
true, would indicate more than a minor infraction; or
(b) Investigative Information that indicates that the subject Licensee represents
an immediate threat to public health and safety regardless of whether the subject
Licensee has been notified and had an opportunity to respond.
(14) "Criminal Background Check" means the submission of fingerprints or
other biometric-based information for a License applicant for the purpose of obtaining
that applicant's criminal history record information, as defined in 28 C.F.R. § 20.3(d)

HB 1844 4
from the Federal Bureau of Investigation and the State's criminal history record
repository as defined in 28 C.F.R. § 20.3(f).
(15) "Data System" means the Commission's repository of information about
Licensees, including but not limited to examination, licensure, investigative, Compact
Privilege, Adverse Action, and Alternative Program.
(16) "Encumbrance" or "Encumbered" means a revocation or suspension of, or
any limitation or condition on, the full and unrestricted practice of Athletic Training.
(17) "Executive Committee" means a group of commissioners elected or
appointed to act on behalf of, and within the powers granted to them by, the compact
and Commission.
(18) "Investigative Information" means information, records, and documents
received or generated by a Licensing Authority pursuant to an investigation.
(19) "Jurisprudence Requirement" means the assessment of an individual's
knowledge of the laws and Rules governing the practice of Athletic Training, as
applicable, in a State.
(20) "License" means current authorization by a Member State to engage in the
practice of Athletic Training.
(21) "Licensee" or "Licensed Athletic Trainer" means an individual who
currently holds an active, unrestricted License and who meets all of the requirements
outlined in section 334.1909.
(22) "Licensing Authority" means the board or agency of a State, or equivalent,
that is responsible for the licensing and regulation of Athletic Trainers.
(23) "Model Compact Language" means the model language for the Athletic
Trainer Compact on file with The Council of State Governments or other entity as
designated by the Commission to which all Member States must substantively adhere
and adopt.
(24) "Member State" means a State that has enacted the compact.
(25) "Remote State" means a Member State other than the State of Qualifying
Licensure.
(26) "Rule" means a regulation promulgated by an authorized entity that has
the force of law.
(27) "Scope of Practice" means the procedures, actions, and processes an
Athletic Trainer licensed in a State is permitted to undertake in that State and the
circumstances under which the Licensee is permitted to undertake those procedures,
actions and processes. Such procedures, actions and processes and the circumstances
under which they may be undertaken may be established through means, including, but
not limited to, statute, regulations, case law, and other processes available to the State

HB 1844 5
Licensing Authority or other government agency. Scope of Practice shall include any
State requirements regarding supervision or direction, if required by such State and as
further defined by such State's statutes and regulations.
(28) "Single State License" means a License issued by any State that authorizes
practice only within the issuing State.
(29) "State" means any state, commonwealth, district, or territory of the United
States of America.
(30) "State of Qualifying Licensure" means the Member State who has issued a
Compact Qualifying License to a Licensee pursuant to this compact.
100 (31) "Unencumbered License" means a License that authorizes a Licensee to
101 engage in the full and unrestricted practice of Athletic Training.
334.1906. 1. To be eligible to join this compact and to maintain eligibility as a
Member State, a State must:
(1) Enact and maintain a statute that is not materially different from the Model
Compact Language;
(2) License and regulate the practice of Athletic Training;
(3) Require that Licensees in that State maintain Continuing Competence
standards as part of their State practice act or Rules;
(4) Have a mechanism in place for receiving and investigating complaints about
Licensees;
(5) Grant the Compact Privilege to a Licensee who meets all the requirements
outlined in section 334.1909 in accordance with the terms of the compact and any Rules
promulgated thereunder;
(6) Participate fully in the Compact Commission's Data System, including using
the unique identifier as defined in Rules;
(7) Notify the Compact Commission, in compliance with the terms of the
Compact and Rules, of any Adverse Action or the availability of Current Significant
Investigative Information regarding a Licensee;
(8) Within a time frame established by Rule, implement or utilize procedures for
considering the criminal history records of applicants for a Compact Qualifying License
which includes receiving the results of the Federal Bureau of Investigation record search
and shall use those results in making licensure decisions. These procedures shall include
the submission of fingerprints or other biometric-based information by applicants for
the purpose of obtaining an applicant's criminal history record information from the
Federal Bureau of Investigation and the agency responsible for retaining that State's
criminal records; and

HB 1844 6
(a) A Member State must fully implement a Criminal Background Check
requirement in order to participate in the issuance and acceptance of Compact
Privileges.
(b) Communication between a Member State and the Compact Commission or
among Member States regarding the verification of eligibility for licensure through the
compact shall not include any information received from the Federal Bureau of
Investigation relating to a federal criminal records check performed by a Member
State;
(9) Comply with and enforce the Rules of the Compact Commission.
2. Member States may set and collect a fee for issuance and renewal of a
Compact Privilege to applicants.
3. Individuals without a Compact Qualifying License shall continue to be able to
apply for a Member State's Single-State License as provided under the laws of each
Member State.
4. Nothing in this compact shall affect the requirements established by a
Member State for the issuance of a Single State License.
5. A Compact Qualifying License shall be recognized by each Remote State as
authorizing that Licensee to engage in the practice of Athletic Training, under a
Compact Privilege, in another Member State in accordance with the requirements in
section 334.1909.
334.1909. 1. To be eligible for a Compact Privilege under the terms and
provisions of the compact, the Licensee shall complete a Criminal Background Check
performed by the Licensing Authority in the State of Qualifying Licensure prior to
entry in the compact and shall:
(1) Satisfy one of the following two pathways:
(a) Hold a valid current active certification through the BOC, or its successor
organization; or
(b) If a Licensee does not meet the requirements of paragraph (a) of this
subdivision, the following must be completed:
a. An education program which is either:
(i) At least a bachelor's degree with a major course of study in Athletic Training,
or an equivalent course of study from a college or university accredited at the time of
graduation by CAATE, or its successor organization;
(ii) An academic degree from a college or university in a foreign country
equivalent to the degree described in item (i) of this subparagraph with a major course
of study as described in item (i) of this subparagraph that is accredited by CAATE, or
its successor organization; or

HB 1844 7
(iii) The substantial equivalent of the foregoing which the Commission may
determine by Rule.
b. Successful completion of the exam administered by the BOC, or its successor
organization, preceding the date of the Licensee's application for Licensure in their
State of Qualifying Licensure or the substantial equivalent of the foregoing requirement
which the Commission may determine by Rule;
(2) Hold a Compact Qualifying License;
(3) Have not had any Encumbrance against any license or Compact Privilege to
practice Athletic Training within the previous two (2) years;
(4) Be eligible for a Compact Privilege in any Member State in accordance with
section 334.1909;
(5) Notify the Compact Commission that the Licensee is seeking the Compact
Privilege within a Remote State or States;
(6) Pay any applicable fees, including any State fee, for the Compact Privilege;
(7) Meet only the Continuing Competence requirements established by the State
of Qualifying Licensure;
(8) Comply with any requirements of the State of Qualifying Licensure as set
forth in section 334.1906;
(9) Meet any Jurisprudence Requirements established by the Remote State or
States in which the Licensee is seeking a Compact Privilege; and
(10) Report to the Compact Commission any Adverse Action, Encumbrance, or
restriction on a license taken by any non-Member State within 30 days from the date the
action is taken.
2. The Compact Privilege is valid until the expiration date of the Compact
Qualifying License. To maintain a Compact Privilege, renewal of the Compact Privilege
shall be congruent with the renewal of the Compact Qualifying License as the Compact
Commission may define by Rule. The Licensee must comply with the requirements of
this section to maintain the Compact Privilege in the Remote State. A Licensee may
apply for and hold Compact Privileges in multiple Member States.
3. A Licensed Athletic Trainer must follow the Scope of Practice of the Member
State where the patient is located. A Licensee engaging in the practice of Athletic
Training in a Remote State under the Compact Privilege shall adhere to the Scope of
Practice laws and regulations of the Remote State. Licensees shall be responsible for
educating themselves on, and complying with, any and all Scope of Practice laws and
regulations and State laws relating to the remote practice of Athletic Training, as
applicable.

HB 1844 8
4. A Licensee engaging in the practice of Athletic Training in a Remote State is
subject to that State's regulatory authority. A Remote State may, in accordance with
due process and that State's laws, remove a Licensee's Compact Privilege in the Remote
State for a specific period of time, impose fines, or take any other necessary actions to
protect the health and safety of its citizens. Any Member State which undertakes such
an action shall promptly notify the Member State and the Commission as specified in
the Rules. The Licensee may be deemed to be ineligible to exercise the Compact
Privilege by any Member State until the specific time for removal has passed and all
fines are paid.
5. All Member State disciplinary orders that impose Adverse Action against a
Compact Qualifying License shall result in deactivation of the Licensee's Compact
Privilege in all Member States during the pendency of the order. If a Compact
Qualifying License is Encumbered, the Licensee shall lose the Compact Privilege in any
Remote State until the following occur:
(1) The Compact Qualifying License is no longer Encumbered; and
(2) The Licensee has not had any Encumbrance or restriction against any
License, Compact Qualifying License or Compact Privilege within the previous two (2)
years.
6. Once an Encumbered License is restored to good standing as a Compact
Qualifying License (as certified by the Licensing Authority), the Licensee must meet the
requirements of this section to obtain a Compact Privilege in any Remote State.
7. If a Licensee's Compact Privilege in any Remote State is removed, that
Licensee may also lose the Compact Privilege in other Remote States, as each Member
State shall determine in its sole authority, until the following occur:
(1) The specific period of time for which the Compact Privilege was removed has
ended;
(2) All fines have been paid; and
(3) Have not had any Encumbrance or restriction against any License or
Compact Privilege within the previous two (2) years.
8. Once the requirements of subsection 7 of this section have been met, the
Licensee must meet the requirements in subsection 1 of this section to obtain a Compact
Privilege in a Remote State.
334.1912. 1. A Licensee may only designate one License as their Compact
Qualifying License at a time. The procedures for such designation may be further
defined by Compact Commission Rule.
2. Nothing in this Section shall require that the State of Qualifying Licensure be
the State of primary residence or State of primary practice for the Licensee.

HB 1844 9
3. Nothing in this Compact shall interfere with a Licensee's ability to hold a
Single State License in multiple States.
4. Nothing in this Compact shall affect the requirements established by a
Member State for the issuance of a Single State License.
334.1915. An Active Military Member or their spouse shall not be required to
pay a fee to the Commission for a Compact Privilege. If a Member State chooses to
charge a Member State fee, it may choose to charge a reduced fee or no fee to an Active
Military Member or their spouse for a Compact Privilege.
334.1918. 1. A Member State in which a Licensee is issued a Compact
Qualifying License shall have the exclusive authority to impose Adverse Action against
the Compact Qualifying License issued by that Member State.
2. A Member State may take Adverse Action based on Current Significant
Investigative Information of a Remote State, so long as the Member State follows its
own procedures for imposing Adverse Action.
3. Nothing in this compact shall override a Member State's decision that
participation in an Alternative Program may be used in lieu of Adverse Action and that
such participation shall remain non-public if required by the Member State's laws or
Rules.
4. A Remote State shall have the authority to:
(1) Take Adverse Actions as set forth herein against a Licensee's Compact
Privilege in that State; and
(2) Issue subpoenas for both hearings and investigations that require the
attendance and testimony of witnesses as well as the production of evidence.
(a) Subpoenas may be issued by a Member State Athletic Training Licensing
Authority for the attendance and testimony of witnesses and the production of evidence.
(b) A Member State which issues a subpoena may request service of that
subpoena by another Member State. The Member State receiving the request to serve a
subpoena shall serve the subpoena if it is deemed enforceable by a court of competent
jurisdiction according to the practice and procedure in the receiving Member State.
(c) The issuing authority shall pay any witness fees, travel expenses, mileage, and
other fees required by the service statutes of the State where the witnesses or evidence
are located.
5. For purposes of taking Adverse Action, a Member State shall give the same
priority and effect to reported conduct received from another Member State as it would
if the conduct had occurred within that State. In so doing, the investigating Member
State shall apply its own State laws to determine appropriate action.

HB 1844 10
6. A Member State, if otherwise permitted by State law, may recover from the
affected Licensee the costs of investigations and dispositions of cases resulting from any
Adverse Action taken against that Licensee.
7. (1) In addition to the authority granted to a Member State by its respective
State law, any Member State may participate with other Member States in joint
investigations of Licensees.
(2) Member States shall share any Current Significant Investigative
Information, litigation, or compliance materials in furtherance of any joint or
individual investigation initiated under the compact. In sharing such information
between Member State Athletic Trainer Licensing Authorities, all information obtained
shall be kept confidential, except as otherwise mutually agreed upon by the sharing and
receiving Member States.
(3) A Remote State may issue subpoenas on behalf of a Member State for both
hearings and investigations that require the attendance and testimony of witnesses as
well as the production of evidence.
8. If a Member State takes Adverse Action, it shall promptly notify the
administrator of the Data System. The administrator of the Data System shall promptly
notify all Member States of any Adverse Actions by Remote States.
9. Nothing in this compact may permit a Member State to take any Adverse
Action against a Licensee or holder of a Compact Privilege for conduct or practice
occurring in another Member State that was legal in the Member State at the time it
was undertaken.
334.1921. 1. The compact Member States hereby create and establish a joint
government agency whose membership consists of all Member States that have enacted
the compact known as the Athletic Trainer Licensure Compact Commission. The
Compact Commission is an instrumentality of the Member States acting jointly and not
an instrumentality of any one State. The Compact Commission shall come into
existence on or after the effective date of the Compact as set forth in section 334.1933.
2. (1) Each Member State shall have and be limited to one (1) Commissioner
selected by that Member State's Licensing Authority within 60 days of the Member
State's effective date.
(2) The Commissioner shall be an administrator or their designated staff or
current board member of the Licensing Authority.
(3) The Compact Commission may recommend removal or suspension of any
Commissioner from office.
(4) A Member State's Licensing Authority shall fill any vacancy of its
Commissioner occurring on the Compact Commission within 60 days of the vacancy.

HB 1844 11
(5) Each Commissioner shall be entitled to one vote on all matters before the
Compact Commission requiring a vote by the Commissioners.
(6) The Compact Commission shall meet at least once during each calendar year.
Additional meetings may be held as set forth in the Commission bylaws. A
Commissioner shall vote in person or by such other means as provided in the bylaws.
The bylaws may provide for Commissioners to meet by telecommunication,
videoconference, or other means of communication.
3. The Compact Commission shall have the following powers:
(1) Promulgate, adopt, and amend Rules and bylaws;
(2) Establish code of conduct, confidentiality, and conflict of interest policies for
Commissioners;
(3) Establish the fiscal year of the Compact Commission;
(4) Maintain its financial records in accordance with the bylaws;
(5) Purchase and maintain insurance and insurance bonds;
(6) Accept, or contract for services of personnel, including, but not limited to,
employees of a Member State;
(7) Conduct a financial review or audit;
(8) Hire employees, elect or appoint officers, fix compensation, define duties,
grant such individuals appropriate authority to carry out the purposes of the Compact,
and establish the Compact Commission's personnel policies and programs relating to
conflicts of interest, qualifications of personnel, and other related personnel matters;
(9) Enter into contracts or arrangements for the management of the affairs of
the Commission;
(10) Assess and collect fees;
(11) Accept any and all appropriate gifts, donations, grants of money, other
sources of revenue, equipment, supplies, materials, and services, and receive, utilize, and
dispose of the same; provided that at all times the Compact Commission shall avoid any
appearance of impropriety or conflict of interest;
(12) Lease, purchase, retain, own, hold, improve, invest, or use any property,
real, personal, or mixed, or any undivided interest therein;
(13) Sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, abandon, or otherwise
dispose of any property real, personal, or mixed;
(14) Establish a budget and make expenditures;
(15) Borrow and invest money;
(16) Meet and take such actions as are consistent with the provisions of this
compact, the Compact Commission's Rules, and the bylaws;

HB 1844 12
(17) Initiate and conclude legal proceedings or actions in the name of the
Compact Commission, provided that the standing of any Licensing Authority to sue or
be sued under applicable law shall not be affected;
(18) Maintain and certify records and information provided to a Member State
as the authenticated business records of the Compact Commission, and designate an
agent to do so on the Compact Commission's behalf;
(19) Provide and receive information from, and cooperate with, law enforcement
agencies;
(20) Determine whether a State's adopted language is materially different from
the Model Compact Language such that the State would not qualify for participation in
the compact;
(21) Establish and elect an Executive Committee, including a chair and a vice
chair, secretary, treasurer, and such other offices as the Commission shall establish by
Rule or bylaw;
(22) Appoint committees, including standing committees, composed of Member
State Commissioners, State regulators, State legislators or their representatives, and
consumer representatives, and such other interested persons as may be designated in
this compact and the bylaws; and
(23) Perform such other functions as may be necessary or appropriate to achieve
the purposes of this compact.
4. (1) The Executive Committee shall have the power to act on behalf of the
Compact Commission according to the terms of this compact. The powers, duties, and
responsibilities of the Executive Committee shall include:
(a) Exercise the powers and duties of the Compact Commission during the
interim between Compact Commission meetings, except for adopting or amending
Rules, adopting or amending bylaws, and exercising any other powers and duties
expressly reserved to the Compact Commission by Rule or bylaw;
(b) Oversee the day-to-day activities of the administration of the Compact
including enforcement and compliance with the provisions of the Compact, its Rules and
bylaws, and other such duties as deemed necessary;
(c) Recommend to the Compact Commission changes to the Rules or bylaws,
changes to this compact legislation, fees charged to Compact Member States, fees
charged to Licensees, and other fees;
(d) Ensure compact administration services are appropriately provided,
including by contract;
(e) Prepare and recommend the budget;
(f) Maintain financial records on behalf of the Compact Commission;

HB 1844 13
(g) Monitor compact compliance of Member States and provide compliance
reports to the Compact Commission;
(h) Establish additional committees as necessary; and
(i) Other duties as provided in the Rules or bylaws of the Compact Commission.
(2) The Executive Committee shall be composed of five voting members, elected
by the Compact Commission:
(a) The chair and vice chair of the Compact Commission, shall be voting
members of the Executive Committee;
(b) The Compact Commission shall elect up to three additional voting members
from the current membership of the Compact Commission to include the offices of
treasurer, secretary, and one member-at-large; and
100 (c) Up to four (4) ex-officio, nonvoting members from recognized national
101 athletic trainer organizations.
102 (3) The Compact Commission may remove any member of the Executive
103 Committee as provided in the Compact Commission's bylaws.
104 (4) (a) The Executive Committee shall meet at least annually.
105 (b) Executive Committee meetings shall be open to the public, except that the
106 Executive Committee may meet in a closed, non-public meeting as provided in this
107 section.
108 (c) The Executive Committee shall give advance notice of its meetings, posted on
109 its website and as determined by rule or bylaw to provide notice to persons with an
110 interest in the business of the Compact Commission.
111 (d) The Executive Committee may hold a special meeting in accordance with this
112 section.
113 5. The Compact Commission shall adopt and provide to the Member States an
114 annual report.
115 6. (1) All meetings shall be open to the public, except that the Compact
116 Commission may meet in a closed, non-public meeting as provided in this section.
117 (2) Public notice for all meetings of the full Compact Commission of meetings
118 shall be given in the same manner as required under the rulemaking provisions in this
119 compact, except that the Compact Commission may hold a special meeting as provided
120 in this section.
121 (3) The Compact Commission may hold a special meeting when it must meet to
122 conduct emergency business by giving 24 hours' notice to all Commissioners, on the
123 Compact Commission's website, and other means as provided in the Compact
124 Commission's Rules. The Compact Commission's legal counsel shall certify that the
125 Compact Commission's need to meet qualifies as an emergency.

HB 1844 14
126 (4) The Compact Commission or the Executive Committee or other committees
127 of the Compact Commission may convene in a closed, non-public meeting for the
128 Compact Commission or Executive Committee or other committees of the Compact
129 Commission to receive legal advice or to discuss:
130 (a) Non-compliance of a Member State with its obligations under the Compact;
131 (b) The employment, compensation, discipline or other matters, practices or
132 procedures related to specific employees;
133 (c) Current or threatened discipline of a Licensee by a Member State's Licensing
134 Authority;
135 (d) Current, threatened, or reasonably anticipated litigation;
136 (e) Negotiation of contracts for the purchase, lease, or sale of goods, services, or
137 real estate;
138 (f) Accusing any person of a crime or formally censuring any person;
139 (g) Trade secrets or commercial or financial information that is privileged or
140 confidential;
141 (h) Information of a personal nature where disclosure would constitute a clearly
142 unwarranted invasion of personal privacy;
143 (i) Investigative records compiled for law enforcement purposes;
144 (j) Information related to any investigative reports prepared by or on behalf of
145 or for use of the Compact Commission or other committee charged with responsibility
146 of investigation or determination of compliance issues pursuant to the compact;
147 (k) Matters specifically exempted from disclosure by federal or Member State
148 law; or
149 (l) Other matters as specified in Rules of the Compact Commission.
150 (5) If a meeting, or portion of a meeting, is closed, the Compact Commission's
151 legal counsel or designee shall certify that the meeting will be closed and reference each
152 relevant exempting provision, and such reference shall be recorded in the minutes. All
153 minutes and documents of a closed meeting shall remain under seal, subject to release
154 only by a majority vote of the Compact Commission or order of a court of competent
155 jurisdiction.
156 7. (1) The Compact Commission shall pay, or provide for the payment of, the
157 reasonable expenses of its establishment, organization, and ongoing activities.
158 (2) The Compact Commission may accept any and all appropriate revenue
159 sources as provided in this section.
160 (3) The Compact Commission may levy on and collect an annual assessment
161 from each Member State and impose fees on Licensees of Member States to whom it
162 grants a Compact Privilege to cover the cost of the operations and activities of the

HB 1844 15
163 Compact Commission and its staff, which must be in a total amount sufficient to cover
164 its annual budget as approved each year for which revenue is not provided by other
165 sources. The aggregate annual assessment amount for Member States shall be allocated
166 based upon a formula that the Compact Commission shall promulgate by Rule.
167 (4) The Compact Commission shall not incur obligations of any kind prior to
168 securing the funds or a loan adequate to meet the same; nor shall the Compact
169 Commission pledge the credit of any of the Member States, except by and with the
170 authority of the Member State.
171 (5) The Compact Commission shall keep accurate accounts of all receipts and
172 disbursements. The receipts and disbursements of the Compact Commission shall be
173 subject to the financial review or audit and accounting procedures established under its
174 bylaws. However, all receipts and disbursements of funds handled by the Compact
175 Commission shall be subject to an annual financial review or audit by a certified or
176 licensed public accountant, and the report of the financial review or audit shall be
177 included in and become part of the annual report of the Compact Commission.
178 8. (1) The members, officers, executive director, employees and representatives
179 of the Compact Commission shall be immune from suit and liability, both personally
180 and in their official capacity, for any claim for damage to or loss of property or personal
181 injury or other civil liability caused by or arising out of any actual or alleged act, error,
182 or omission that occurred, or that the person against whom the claim is made had a
183 reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of Compact Commission
184 employment, duties or responsibilities; provided that nothing in this subdivision shall be
185 construed to protect any such person from suit or liability for any damage, loss, injury,
186 or liability caused by the intentional or willful or wanton misconduct of that person.
187 The procurement of insurance of any type by the Compact Commission shall not in any
188 way compromise or limit the immunity granted hereunder.
189 (2) The Compact Commission shall defend any member, officer, executive
190 director, employee, and representative of the Compact Commission in any civil action
191 seeking to impose liability arising out of any actual or alleged act, error, or omission that
192 occurred within the scope of Compact Commission employment, duties, or
193 responsibilities, or as determined by the Compact Commission that the person
194 against whom the claim is made had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the
195 scope of Compact Commission employment, duties, or responsibilities; provided that
196 nothing herein shall be construed to prohibit that person from retaining their own
197 counsel at their own expense; and provided further, that the actual or alleged act, error,
198 or omission did not result from that person's intentional or willful or wanton
199 misconduct.

HB 1844 16
200 (3) The Compact Commission shall indemnify and hold harmless any member,
201 officer, executive director, employee, and representative of the Compact Commission for
202 the amount of any settlement or judgment obtained against that person arising out of
203 any actual or alleged act, error, or omission that occurred within the scope of Compact
204 Commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, or that such person had a
205 reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of Compact Commission
206 employment, duties, or responsibilities, provided that the actual or alleged act, error, or
207 omission did not result from the intentional or willful or wanton misconduct of that
208 person.
209 (4) Nothing herein shall be construed as a limitation on the liability of any
210 Licensee for professional malpractice or misconduct, which shall be governed solely by
211 any other applicable State laws.
212 (5) Nothing in this compact shall be interpreted to waive or otherwise abrogate a
213 Member State's state action immunity or state action affirmative defense with respect to
214 antitrust claims under the Sherman Act, Clayton Act, or any other State or federal
215 antitrust or anticompetitive law or regulation.
216 (6) Nothing in this compact shall be construed to be a waiver of sovereign
217 immunity by the Member States or by the Compact Commission.
334.1924. 1. The Commission shall provide for the development, maintenance,
operation, and utilization of a coordinated Data System and reporting system containing
licensure, Compact Privileges, Adverse Action, and the presence of Current Significant
Investigative Information on all Licensees and applicants for a License in Member
States.
2. Notwithstanding any other provision of State law to the contrary, a Member
State shall submit a uniform data set to the Data System on all Licensees, applicants,
and others to whom this compact is applicable as required by the Rules of the Compact
Commission, including:
(1) Personally identifying information;
(2) Licensure data;
(3) Adverse Actions against a Licensee, License applicant or Compact Privilege
and information related thereto;
(4) Non-confidential information related to Alternative Program participation,
the beginning and ending dates of such participation, and other information related to
such participation;
(5) Any denial of an application for licensure, and the reason or reasons for such
denial, (excluding the reporting of any criminal history record information where
prohibited by law);

HB 1844 17
(6) A binary determination regarding the presence of Current Significant
Investigative Information; and
(7) Other information that may facilitate the administration of this compact or
the protection of the public, as determined by the Rules of the Commission.
3. The records and information provided to a Member State pursuant to this
compact or through the Data System, when certified by the Commission or an agent
thereof, shall constitute the authenticated business records of the Commission, and shall
be entitled to any associated hearsay exception in any relevant judicial, quasi-judicial or
administrative proceedings in a Member State.
4. Current Significant Investigative Information pertaining to a Licensee in any
Member State will only be available to other Member States.
5. It is the responsibility of the Member States to monitor the Data System to
determine whether Adverse Action has been taken against a Licensee or License
applicant. Adverse Action information pertaining to a Licensee or License applicant in
any Member State will be available to any other Member State.
6. Member States contributing information to the Data System may designate
information that may not be shared with the public without the express permission of
the contributing State.
7. Any information submitted to the Data System that is subsequently expunged
pursuant to federal law or the laws of the Member State contributing the information
shall be removed from the Data System.
334.1927. 1. The Compact Commission shall promulgate reasonable Rules in
order to effectively and efficiently implement and administer the purposes and
provisions of the Compact. A Rule shall be invalid and have no force or effect only if a
court of competent jurisdiction holds that the Rule is invalid because the Compact
Commission exercised its rulemaking authority in a manner that is beyond the scope
and purposes of the Compact, or the powers granted hereunder, or based upon another
applicable standard of review.
2. The Rules of the Compact Commission shall have the force of law in each
Member State, provided however that where the Rules conflict with the laws or
regulations of a Member State that relate to the Scope of Practice a Licensed Athletic
Trainer is permitted to undertake in that State and the circumstances under which they
may do so, as held by a court of competent jurisdiction, the Rules of the Compact
Commission shall be ineffective in that State to the extent of the conflict.
3. The Compact Commission shall exercise its rulemaking powers pursuant to
the criteria set forth in this section and the Rules adopted thereunder. Rules of this

HB 1844 18
compact shall become binding on the day following adoption or as of the date specified
in the Rule or amendment, whichever is later.
4. If a majority of the legislatures of the Member States rejects a Rule or portion
of a Rule, by enactment of a statute or resolution in the same manner used to adopt the
Compact within four (4) years of the date of adoption of the Rule, then such Rule shall
have no further force and effect in any Member State.
5. Rules shall be adopted at a regular or special meeting of the Compact
Commission.
6. Prior to adoption of a proposed Rule, the Compact Commission shall hold a
public hearing and allow persons to provide oral and written comments, data, facts,
opinions, and arguments. At least thirty (30) days in advance of the public hearing on
the proposed Rule, the Compact Commission shall provide a notice of proposed
rulemaking:
(1) On the website of the Compact Commission or other publicly accessible
platform;
(2) To persons who have requested notice of the Compact Commission's notices
of proposed rulemaking; and
(3) In such other way or ways as the Compact Commission may by Rule specify.
7. The notice of proposed rulemaking shall include:
(1) The time, date, and location of the public hearing at which the Compact
Commission will hear public comments on the proposed Rule and, if different, the time,
date, and location of the meeting where the Compact Commission will consider and vote
on the proposed Rule;
(2) If the hearing is held via telecommunication, video conference, or other
electronic means, the Compact Commission shall include the mechanism for access to
the hearing in the notice of proposed rulemaking;
(3) The text of the proposed Rule and the reason therefor;
(4) A request for comments on the proposed Rule from any interested person;
and
(5) The manner in which interested persons may submit written comments.
8. All hearings will be recorded. A copy of the recording and all written
comments and documents received by the Compact Commission in response to the
proposed Rule shall be available to the public.
9. Nothing in this section shall be construed as requiring a separate hearing on
each Rule. Rules may be grouped for the convenience of the Compact Commission at
hearings required by this section.

HB 1844 19
10. (1) The Compact Commission shall, by majority vote of all members, take
final action on the proposed Rule based on the rulemaking record and the full text of the
Rule.
(2) The Compact Commission may adopt changes to the proposed Rule provided
the changes do not enlarge the original purpose of the proposed Rule.
(3) The Compact Commission shall provide an explanation of the reasons for
substantive changes made to the proposed Rule as well as reasons for substantive
changes not made that were recommended by commenters.
(4) The Compact Commission shall determine a reasonable effective date for the
Rule. Except for an emergency as provided in this section, the effective date of the Rule
shall be no sooner than 30 days after issuing the notice that it adopted or amended the
Rule.
11. Upon determination that an emergency exists, the Compact Commission may
consider and adopt an emergency Rule with 24 hours' notice, with opportunity to
comment, provided that the usual rulemaking procedures provided in the compact and
in this section shall be retroactively applied to the Rule as soon as reasonably possible, in
no event later than ninety (90) days after the effective date of the Rule. For the purposes
of this provision, an emergency Rule is one that must be adopted immediately in order
to:
(1) Meet an imminent threat to public health, safety, or welfare;
(2) Prevent a loss of Compact Commission or Member State funds;
(3) Meet a deadline for the promulgation of a Rule that is established by federal
law or rule; or
(4) Protect public health and safety.
12. The Compact Commission or an authorized committee of the Compact
Commission may direct revisions to a previously adopted Rule for purposes of
correcting typographical errors, errors in format, errors in consistency, or grammatical
errors. Public notice of any revisions shall be posted on the website of the Compact
Commission. The revision shall be subject to challenge by any person for a period of
thirty (30) days after posting. The revision may be challenged only on grounds that the
revision results in a material change to a Rule. A challenge shall be made in writing and
delivered to the Compact Commission prior to the end of the notice period. If no
challenge is made, the revision will take effect without further action. If the revision is
challenged, the revision may not take effect without the approval of the Compact
Commission.
13. No Member State's rulemaking requirements shall apply under this
Compact.

HB 1844 20
334.1930. 1. (1) The executive and judicial branches of State government in
each Member State shall enforce this compact and take all actions necessary and
appropriate to implement the compact.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in this compact, venue is proper and judicial
proceedings by or against the Compact Commission shall be brought solely and
exclusively in a court of competent jurisdiction where the principal office of the
Compact Commission is located. The Compact Commission may waive venue and
jurisdictional defenses to the extent it adopts or consents to participate in alternative
dispute resolution proceedings. Nothing herein shall affect or limit the selection or
propriety of venue in any action against a Licensee for professional malpractice,
misconduct or any such similar matter.
(3) The Compact Commission shall be entitled to receive service of process in
any proceeding regarding the enforcement or interpretation of the compact and shall
have standing to intervene in such a proceeding for all purposes. Failure to provide the
Compact Commission service of process shall render a judgment or order void as to the
Compact Commission, this Compact, or promulgated Rules.
2. (1) If the Compact Commission determines that a Member State has
defaulted in the performance of its obligations or responsibilities under this compact or
the promulgated Rules, the Commission shall provide written notice to the defaulting
State. The notice of default shall describe the default, the proposed means of curing the
default, and any other action that the Compact Commission may take, and shall offer
training and specific technical assistance regarding the default.
(2) The Compact Commission shall provide a copy of the notice of default to the
other Member States.
3. If a State in default fails to cure the default, the defaulting State may be
terminated from the compact upon an affirmative vote of a majority of the
Commissioners of the Member States, and all rights, privileges and benefits conferred
on that State by this compact may be terminated on the effective date of termination. A
cure of the default does not relieve the offending State of obligations or liabilities
incurred during the period of default.
4. Termination of membership in the compact shall be imposed only after all
other means of securing compliance have been exhausted. Notice of intent to suspend or
terminate shall be given by the Compact Commission to the governor, the majority and
minority leaders of the defaulting State's legislature, the defaulting State's Licensing
Authority and each of the Member States' Licensing Authority.

HB 1844 21
5. A State that has been terminated is responsible for all assessments,
obligations, and liabilities incurred through the effective date of termination, including
obligations that extend beyond the effective date of termination.
6. Upon the termination of a State's membership from this compact, that State
shall immediately provide notice to all Licensees within that State of such termination.
The terminated State shall continue to recognize all Licenses and Compact Privileges
granted pursuant to this compact for a minimum of 180 days after the date of said
notice of termination.
7. The Compact Commission shall not bear any costs related to a State that is
found to be in default or that has been terminated from the compact, unless agreed upon
in writing between the Compact Commission and the defaulting State.
8. The defaulting State may appeal the action of the Compact Commission by
petitioning the U.S. District Court for the District of Columbia or the federal district
where the Compact Commission has its principal offices. The prevailing party shall be
awarded all costs of such litigation, including reasonable attorney's fees.
9. (1) Upon request by a Member State, the Compact Commission shall attempt
to resolve disputes related to the compact that arise among Member States and between
Member and non-Member States.
(2) The Compact Commission shall promulgate a Rule providing for both
mediation and binding dispute resolution for disputes as appropriate.
10. (1) By two-thirds majority (2/3) vote, the Compact Commission may initiate
legal action against a Member State in default in the United States District Court for the
District of Columbia or the federal district where the Compact Commission has its
principal offices to enforce compliance with the provisions of the compact and its
promulgated Rules. The relief sought may include both injunctive relief and damages.
In the event judicial enforcement is necessary, the prevailing party shall be awarded all
costs of such litigation, including reasonable attorney's fees. The remedies herein shall
not be the exclusive remedies of the Compact Commission. The Compact Commission
may pursue any other remedies available under federal or the defaulting Member
State's law.
(2) A Member State may initiate legal action against the Compact Commission
in the U.S. District Court for the District of Columbia or the federal district where the
Compact Commission has its principal offices to enforce compliance with the provisions
of the compact and its promulgated Rules. The relief sought may include both
injunctive relief and damages. In the event judicial enforcement is necessary, the
prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of such litigation, including reasonable
attorney's fees.

HB 1844 22
(3) No person other than a Member State shall enforce this compact against the
Compact Commission.
334.1933. 1. (1) The Compact shall come into effect on the date on which the
compact statute is enacted into law in the seventh Member State.
(2) (a) On or after the effective date of the compact, the Compact Commission
shall convene and review the enactment of each of the first seven Member States
("Charter Member States") to determine if the statute enacted and made effective by
each such Charter Member State is materially different than the model compact statute.
(b) A Charter Member State whose enactment is found to be materially different
from the Model Compact Language shall be entitled to the default process set forth in
section 334.1930.
(c) If any Member State is later found to be in default, or is terminated or
withdraws from the Compact, the Compact Commission shall remain in existence and
the Compact shall remain in effect even if the number of Member States should be less
than seven.
(3) Member States enacting the compact subsequent to the seven initial Charter
Member States shall be subject to the process set forth in this section to determine if
their enactments are materially different from the model Compact statute and whether
they qualify for participation in the Compact.
(4) All actions taken for the benefit of the Compact Commission or in
furtherance of the purposes of the administration of the compact prior to the effective
date of the compact or the Compact Commission coming into existence shall be
considered to be actions of the Compact Commission unless specifically repudiated by
the Compact Commission.
(5) Any State that joins the compact subsequent to the Compact Commission's
initial adoption of the Rules and bylaws shall be subject to the Rules and bylaws as they
exist on the date on which the compact becomes law in that State. Any Rule that has
been previously adopted by the Compact Commission shall have the full force and effect
of law on the day the compact becomes law in that State.
2. (1) Any Member State may withdraw from this compact by enacting a statute
repealing the same.
(2) A Member State's withdrawal shall not take effect until 180 days after
enactment of the repealing statute.
(3) Withdrawal shall not affect the continuing requirement of the withdrawing
State's Licensing Authority to comply with the investigative and Adverse Action
reporting requirements of this compact prior to the effective date of withdrawal.

HB 1844 23
(4) Upon the enactment of a statute withdrawing from this compact, a State shall
immediately provide notice of such withdrawal to all Licensees and privilege holders
within that State. Notwithstanding any subsequent statutory enactment to the contrary,
such withdrawing State shall continue to recognize all Compact Privileges granted
pursuant to this compact for a minimum of 180 days after the date of such notice of
withdrawal.
(5) Nothing contained in this compact shall be construed to invalidate or prevent
any licensure agreement or other cooperative arrangement between a Member State
and a non-Member State that does not conflict with the provisions of this compact.
(6) This compact may be amended by the Member States. No amendment to this
compact shall become effective and binding upon any Member State until it is enacted
into the laws of all Member States.
334.1936. 1. This compact and the Compact Commission's rulemaking
authority shall be liberally construed so as to effectuate the purposes, and the
implementation and administration of the compact. Provisions of the compact expressly
authorizing or requiring the promulgation of Rules shall not be construed to limit the
Compact Commission's rulemaking authority solely for those purposes.
2. The provisions of this compact shall be severable and if any phrase, clause,
sentence or provision of this compact is held by a court of competent jurisdiction to be
contrary to the constitution of any Member State, a State seeking participation in the
compact, or of the United States, or the applicability thereof to any government, agency,
person or circumstance is held to be unconstitutional by a court of competent
jurisdiction, the validity of the remainder of this compact and the applicability thereof
to any other government, agency, person or circumstance shall not be affected thereby.
3. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the Compact Commission may deny a State's
participation in the compact or terminate a Member State's participation in the
Compact if it determines that a constitutional requirement of a Member State is a
material departure from the Compact. Otherwise, if this compact shall be held to be
contrary to the constitution of any Member State, the Compact shall remain in full force
and effect as to the remaining Member States and in full force and effect as to the
Member State affected as to all severable matters.
334.1939. 1. Nothing herein shall prevent or inhibit the enforcement of any
other law of a Member State that is not inconsistent with the compact.
2. Any laws, statutes, regulations, or other legal requirements in a Member State
in conflict with the compact are superseded to the extent of the conflict.

HB 1844 24
3. All permissible agreements between the Compact Commission and the
Member States are binding in accordance with their terms.
✔